Washington statutes.
RCW 43.392.030

Interagency electric vehicle coordinating council.

(1) There is hereby created an interagency electric vehicle coordinating council jointly led by the Washington state department of commerce and the Washington state department of transportation with participation from the following agencies:

(a) The office of financial management;

(b) The department of ecology;

(c) The department of enterprise services;

(d) The state efficiency and environmental performance office;

(e) The department of agriculture;

(f) The department of health;

(g) The utilities and transportation commission;

(h) A representative from the office of the superintendent of public instruction knowledgeable on issues pertaining to student transportation; and

(i) Other agencies with key roles in electrifying the transportation sector.

(2) The Washington state department of commerce and Washington state department of transportation shall assign staff in each agency to lead the council's coordination work and provide ongoing reports to the governor and legislature including, but not limited to, the transportation, energy, economic development, and other appropriate legislative committees.

[ 2022 c 182 s 428.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2022 c 182: See notes following RCW 70A.65.240.